Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.250

Definitions.

As used in this chapter and unless the context indicates otherwise, words and phrases shall mean:

"District" means a public utility district as created under the laws of the state of Washington authorized to engage in the business of generating and/or distributing electricity.

"City" means any city or town in the state of Washington authorized to engage in the business of generating and/or distributing electricity.

"Canada" means Canada or any province thereof.

"Operating agency" or "joint operating agency" means a municipal corporation created pursuant to RCW 43.52.360, as now or hereafter amended.

"Board of directors" means the board established under RCW 43.52.370.

"Executive board" means the board established under RCW 43.52.374.

"Board" means the board of directors of the joint operating agency unless the operating agency is constructing, operating, terminating, or decommissioning a nuclear power plant under a site certification agreement under chapter 80.50 RCW, in which case "board" means the executive board.

"Public utility" means any person, firm or corporation, political subdivision or governmental subdivision including cities, towns and public utility districts engaged in or authorized to engage in the business of generating, transmitting or distributing electric energy.

"Revenue bonds or warrants" means bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, warrants, certificates of indebtedness, commercial paper, refunding or renewal obligations, payable from a special fund or revenues of the utility properties operated by the joint operating agency.

"Electrical resources" means both electric energy and conservation.

"Electrical energy" means electric energy produced by any means including water power, steam power, nuclear power, and conservation.

"Conservation" means any reduction in electric power consumption as a result of increases in efficiency of energy use, production, or distribution.

[ 1987 c 376 s 8; 1982 1st ex.s. c 43 s 1; 1981 1st ex.s. c 1 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 184 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.52.250. Prior: 1953 c 281 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—1982 1st ex.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.52.374.

Severability—1981 1st ex.s. c 1: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 1st ex.s. c 1 s 5.]